California statutes. Education Code
(a) The commission, through an interagency agreement with the State Department of Social Services, currently operates a federally funded scholarship program, known as the Chafee Educational and Training Vouchers Program, that provides grant aid to provide access to California’s current and former foster youth to postsecondary education. Funds provided through an appropriation by the Legislature shall be supplemental to funds provided by the federal government, and are designated to ensure program availability in the absence of and before the annual receipt of federal funds for this purpose. The department shall opt in, as necessary, to expand program age eligibility of former foster youth up to 26 years of age pursuant to federal program guidelines. The department shall pursue and seek possible Chafee Educational and Training
 Vouchers Program federal matching dollars.

(b) Funds provided for this program shall be used to assist students who are current and former foster youth, for career and technical training or traditional college courses. The commission shall operate this program in accordance with the program instructions provided by the federal Department of Health and Human Services, Administration for Children and Families, and the program guidelines developed by the State Department of Social Services.

(c) The total amount of funding and the amount of individual awards shall depend upon the amount of federal funding provided in addition to state funding. The commission, in conjunction with the State Department of Social Services, shall determine the individual award amounts and total number of students awarded on an annual basis as the amount of total annual funding is determined.

(d) Commencing with the 2021–22 award year, the commission may make initial award offers totaling up to 200 percent of the total state and federal program funding available for all awards. Each year, the commission, in conjunction with the State Department of Social Services, shall determine the number of initial awards offered, based on the historical acceptance rate of initial awards and the size of awards, so not to exceed the total amount of available funding for the full award cycle. The commission shall make an award offer contingent upon available funding, and may adjust or withdraw an award offer before payment to ensure that total award payments do not exceed the total amount of available funding for the award cycle. The commission shall inform each recipient of an award offer that the offer may be withdrawn or adjusted before payment and that an award is payable to an eligible student only to the extent that funding is available.

(e) Commencing with the 2017–18 award year, the commission shall make a new Chafee grant award to a student only if the student attends either of the following:

(1) A qualifying institution that is eligible for participation in the Cal Grant Program pursuant to Section 69432.7.

(2) An institution that is not located in California that satisfies the provisions of subparagraphs (C) and (F) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7.

(f) (1) Commencing with the 2018–19 award year, the commission shall make a Chafee grant award to a student only if the student meets both of the following conditions:

(A) The student will not be 26 years of age or older by July 1
 of the award year.

(B) The student attends either of the following institutions:

(i) A qualifying institution that is eligible for participation in the Cal Grant Program pursuant to Section 69432.7.

(ii) An institution that is not located in California that satisfies the provisions of subparagraphs (C) and (F) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7.

(2) Implementation of this subdivision is contingent upon an appropriation of sufficient funds in the annual Budget Act for this purpose.

(g) The California Community Colleges and the California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, provide all Chafee grant recipients, upon release of the
 first payment, with information regarding available support services on campus and the process for completing an educational plan. In this notification, Chafee grant recipients shall be strongly encouraged to avail themselves of these services if they have not already done so.

(h) (1) (A) If a student fails to demonstrate satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the institution where the student is enrolled, for two consecutive semesters or three consecutive quarters, or an equivalent enrollment period, the student shall meet with an appropriate college staff member to develop a plan for improving academic progress or update an existing plan, in order to ensure that the student is making satisfactory progress toward completion and to receive their remaining Chafee grant funds.

(B) If a student with a plan pursuant to subparagraph
 (A) fails to meet satisfactory academic progress standards for a third consecutive semester or fourth consecutive quarter, or an equivalent enrollment period, the student shall meet with an appropriate college staff member to update the plan, in order to ensure that the student is making satisfactory progress toward completion and to receive their remaining Chafee grant funds.

(C) Once a plan has been developed or updated pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), as applicable, and submitted to the financial aid office, remaining Chafee grant funds shall be released to the student for the next applicable semester, quarter, or other period, in accordance with the existing schedule for release.

(2) A student who fails to update their plan, or who fails to meet satisfactory academic progress standards for a fourth consecutive semester or fifth consecutive quarter, or an equivalent
 enrollment period, shall lose Chafee grant eligibility subject to subdivision (i).

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a college staff member who can assist a student on their plan includes an academic counselor, a Homeless and Foster Student Liaison, as described in Section 67003.5, an Extended Opportunity Programs and Services counselor, a Cooperating Agencies Foster Youth Educational Support Program counselor, a Disabled Student Programs and Services counselor, another campus-based foster youth support program staff member, or another appropriate adviser.

(4) This subdivision and subdivision (i) apply to any student who is otherwise eligible to receive a Chafee grant award pursuant to subdivision (f).

(5) The California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California may use
 existing resources to implement this subdivision and subdivisions (g) and (i), to the extent those resources may be lawfully expended for those purposes.

(6) For purposes of this section, the definition of “satisfactory academic progress” used by the institution where the student is enrolled shall provide that
 homelessness, as defined as a “homeless individual” within the meaning of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11302(a)), or as defined as a “homeless child or youth,” as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), is an extenuating circumstance for students who are otherwise unable to meet the requirements deemed to constitute “satisfactory academic progress” at that institution, and that extenuating circumstance may be considered by the institution to alter or excuse compliance with those progress requirements.

(i) A student who fails to demonstrate satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the institution where the student is enrolled, for four consecutive semesters or five consecutive quarters, or an equivalent enrollment period, shall lose eligibility for a Chafee grant, subject to the following:

(1) A student who loses eligibility may appeal the loss of the Chafee grant during any subsequent semester or quarter, or term, following the loss of eligibility.

(2) An institution shall provide a student written notice of the process for appealing the loss of a Chafee grant, regardless of whether the institution offers an appeal process for loss of other forms of financial aid.

(3) In reviewing the appeal of a student, an institution shall automatically
 reinstate a student’s Chafee grant eligibility if one of the following applies:

(A) The student achieves either a 2.0 GPA during the previous semester or quarter, or other applicable term, or a cumulative GPA of 2.0, even if the student did not meet the institution’s satisfactory academic progress policy requirements.

(B) The student demonstrates the existence of an extenuating circumstance that impeded successful course completion in the past but that has since been addressed such that the student is likely to demonstrate satisfactory academic progress in the future.

(C) The student provides evidence of engagement with a supportive program, either on or off campus, that is assisting the student to make continued academic progress.

(4) A student who
 loses Chafee eligibility by not demonstrating satisfactory academic progress and subsequently is not enrolled for one or more semesters or quarters, or another applicable term or terms, shall be eligible for a Chafee grant upon reenrollment at a qualifying institution.

(j) A student’s receipt of a Chafee grant award shall not exceed five years, which need not be consecutive.

(k) An institution shall not impose any additional eligibility criteria for a Chafee grant other than those described in this section and in Section 677(i) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(l) Commencing with the 2018–19 award year, up to eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) of any appropriation made by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute to expand the Chafee Educational and Training Vouchers Program age
 eligibility of former foster youth up to 26 years of age may be used by the commission or the State Department of Social Services for outreach to newly eligible former foster youth who are at least 23 years of age, but are not yet 26 years of age, for the 2018–19 to 2020–21 fiscal years, inclusive. Outreach may include travel, material development, printing or publication, and other costs, as necessary.

(m) The commission shall annually report to the Legislature all of the following information for the preceding award year:

(1) The number of students who apply to receive a Chafee grant award.

(2) The number of Chafee grants awarded.

(3) The number of Chafee applicants denied due to either of the following reasons:

(A) The Chafee applicant no longer meets the age requirements of the program.

(B) There is insufficient proof of the Chafee applicant’s status as a current or former foster youth.

(4) The number of Chafee awardees unpaid due to any of the following reasons:

(A) Failure to meet minimum enrollment requirements.

(B) Failure to demonstrate satisfactory academic progress according to campus policy.

(C) Any other common reason that a Chafee awardee did not receive a payment.

(5) The number and age of students paid through the Chafee Educational and Training Vouchers
 Program.

(6) The average Chafee grant award amount.

(7) Qualifying institutions where Chafee grant awards are used.

(8) Degree levels for which Chafee grant awards are used.

(9) The amount spent on outreach and education efforts and the types of activities that the authorization in subdivision (l) funded. This information shall include the distribution of outreach funding between the commission and the State Department of Social Services, and any other entity that was involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 285, Sec. 2.   (AB 2416)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

69519.3.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to clarify educational policies for purposes of improving access for low-income students to the CalFresh program established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) For purposes of Section 273.5(a) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a student shall be determined to be attending at least half-time any semester or term in which the student enrolls in at least one-half of the number of credits needed each semester or term to graduate within four years of enrollment as a first-time freshman, or within two years of enrollment as a transfer student, unless prohibited by federal law.

(c) The commission shall notify, in writing, a recipient of a Cal Grant award whose grant includes any amount of funding that has been derived from the Temporary Aid to Needy Families (TANF) block grant or state match in order for the student to verify that the student qualifies for the exemption from the CalFresh program student eligibility rules provided for in Section 273.5(b) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) (1) To the extent the commission is permitted by federal law to use information to determine a student’s CalFresh eligibility and possesses the pertinent information, the commission shall notify students of their exemption from the CalFresh program student eligibility rules provided for in Section 273.5(b) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations and their potential eligibility for CalFresh benefits.

(2) The notification provided in paragraph (1) shall be considered the verification of the student’s exemption from the CalFresh program student eligibility rules provided for in Section 273.5(b) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations, as specified in the notice for purposes of qualifying for the CalFresh program.

(e) The commission shall not be required to provide more than one written notification under this section to a student who is eligible for notification under
 subdivision (c) or (d).

(f) The commission shall confer with stakeholders on at least an annual basis to implement this section and continuously improve the process of securing CalFresh benefits for eligible students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   (SB 20)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.4. Maximizing the Value of the State Student Loan Guarantee Program Assets and Liabilities [69521. - 69521.11.]

69521.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) The student loan guarantee business is not a core mission of government. Recognition of this fact led, in 1996, to the approval of the establishment of an auxiliary organization for the purpose of providing operational and administrative services for the Student Aid Commission’s participation in the Federal Family Education Loan Program.

(2) Pursuant to that authority, an auxiliary organization was established to provide, pursuant to contract, certain services to the Student Aid Commission.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the value of the auxiliary organization’s arrangement with the Student Aid Commission and the Student Aid Commission’s participation in the Federal Family Education Loan Program be maximized through either of the following:

(1) The sale of the state’s interest in the student loan guarantee portfolio of the Student Aid Commission and certain related assets and liabilities of the student loan guarantee program operated by the Student Aid Commission, to a firm approved to act as a state student loan guarantee agency for the Federal Family Education Loan Program by the Secretary of Education.

(2) The entry into an arrangement for the operation of the state student loan guarantee program by an entity meeting the financial and compliance standards established for the Federal Family Education Loan Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

69521.2.

For the purposes of this article, all of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Auxiliary organization” means the organization established pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 69522).

(b) “Director” means the Director of Finance.

(c) “Federal Family Education Loan Program” means the program established pursuant to Part B (commencing with Section 1071) of Subchapter IV of Chapter 28 of Title 20 of the United States Code, and includes, but is not necessarily limited to, the Stafford and PLUS loan programs.

(d) “Federal Student Loan Reserve Fund” means the fund of that name established pursuant to Section 69766.

(e) “Operating agreement” means the agreement entered into between the Student Aid Commission and the auxiliary organization pursuant to Section 69522.

(f) “Secretary of Education” means the United States Secretary of Education and the Secretary of Education acting through the United States Department of Education.

(g) “State student loan guarantee program” means the activities performed by the Student Aid Commission as a state student loan guarantee agency pursuant to Public Law 94-482, and subsequent federal regulations, as authorized pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 69760) or on behalf of the Student Aid Commission by the auxiliary organization.

(h) “State student loan guarantee program assets” means all of the assets of the state student loan guarantee program held by the Student Aid Commission and all assets of the auxiliary organization, tangible and intangible, including, without limitation, the state’s interest in all loan guarantee contracts and agreements, the funds deposited in the Student Loan Operating Fund other than federal funds, all funds held by the auxiliary organization other than federal funds, and the state’s interest in any leases of real property or equipment entered into by the auxiliary organization. These assets shall not include any property of the United States held by the Student Aid Commission or the auxiliary organization, as determined pursuant to Public Law 94-482, or subsequent federal regulations.

(i) “State student loan guarantee program liabilities” means all of the liabilities of the state student loan guarantee program as determined by the Director of Finance.

(j) “Student Loan Operating Fund” means the fund of that name established by Section 69766.

(k) “Transferee guarantee agency” means an alternative student loan guarantee agency for the Federal Family Education Loan Program that is the purchaser of the state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities.

(l) “Transferee guaranty program operator” means the entity with which the state enters into an arrangement for the operation of the state student loan guarantee program pursuant to this article.

(m) “Treasurer” means the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

69521.3.

(a) The Director of Finance is hereby authorized to act as agent for the state and, in that capacity, to sell the state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities not retained by the Student Aid Commission to an entity that the director, in consultation with the Treasurer, determines will provide the best combination of each of the following:

(1) The highest price for those state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities.

(2) The greatest security for the payment of the purchase price.

(3) Demonstrated competence and professional qualifications necessary for the continued satisfactory performance of student loan guarantee services.

(4) The approval of the Secretary of Education.

(5) The quality of student services offered, including, but not necessarily limited to, borrower training in budgeting and financial management, including debt management and other forms of financial literacy.

(6) Borrower transparency or disclosure policies for products or services, or both, offered to students outside of the federal student loan programs.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the sale process shall include the steps the director, in consultation with the Treasurer, deems necessary or convenient to achieve the ends set forth in this section. The process shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The satisfaction of criteria established by the director, in consultation with the Treasurer, consistent with achieving a combination of the best price for those state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities and the continued operation of student loan guarantee services for California under the Federal Family Education Loan Program. These criteria shall include any pertinent requirements of the Secretary of Education.

(2) A Notice of Request for Qualifications sent by the Director of Finance to each firm currently acting as a state student loan guarantee agency under the Federal Family Education Loan Program and any entity proposed by the Secretary of Education, and advertised in the State Contracts Register pursuant to Sections 14827.1 and 14827.2 of the Government Code. This notice shall include a description of the state student loan guarantee program, a summary description of the state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities offered for sale, and a description of the due diligence review process to provide potential purchasers with further information regarding the state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities offered for sale, the selection criteria on which the transaction will be based, the submission requirements and deadlines, and a Department of Finance contact name and telephone number for more information. A copy of the Notice of Request for Qualifications shall be provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within seven days of transmittal to state student loan guarantee agencies.

(3) The evaluation by the director, in consultation with the Treasurer, of all statements timely submitted in response to the Notice of Request for Qualifications sent pursuant to paragraph (2), using the criteria contained in the notice, and, based on those statements, the establishment of a qualified purchasers list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 757, Sec. 24.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

69521.4.

(a) If, after seeking the advice of, and in active participation with, the Treasurer, the Director of Finance determines that an alternative arrangement to the sale of the state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities may be financially beneficial to the state, the Director of Finance is also hereby authorized to enter into an arrangement other than that authorized in Section 69521.3, for the purpose of maximizing the value of the state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities. This arrangement may take any form the director, in consultation with the Treasurer, deems advisable to provide the best combination of each of the following:

(1) The greatest value to the General Fund.

(2) The greatest financial security for achieving value to the General Fund.

(3) The continued satisfactory performance of student loan guarantee services.

(4) The approval of the United States Secretary of Education, to the extent required by Public Law 94-482, or subsequent federal regulations.

(5) The quality of student services offered, including, but not necessarily limited to, borrower training in budgeting and financial management, including debt management and other forms of financial literacy.

(6) Borrower transparency or disclosure policies for products or services, or both, offered to students outside of the federal student loan programs.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this process shall include the steps the Director of Finance, in consultation with the Treasurer, deems necessary or convenient to achieve the ends set forth in this section. The process shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The satisfaction of the established criteria consistent with achieving a combination of the greatest value to the General Fund and the continued operation of student loan guarantee services for California under the Federal Family Education Loan Program. The criteria shall include any pertinent requirements of the Secretary of Education.

(2) A Notice of Request for Qualifications sent by the director to each nonprofit entity currently acting as a state student loan guaranty agency under the Federal Family Education Loan Program, any entity known to the director to be acting as a servicing agent for a state student loan guaranty agency, and any nonprofit entity proposed by the Secretary of Education, and advertised in the State Contracts Register pursuant to Sections 14827.1 and 14827.2 of the Government Code. The notice shall include a description of the state student loan guarantee program, a summary description of the state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities, and a description of the due diligence review process to provide further information regarding the state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities, the selection criteria on which the transaction will be based, submission requirements and date, and a Department of Finance contact name and phone number for more information. A copy of the Notice of Request for Qualifications shall be provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within seven days of transmittal to state student loan guarantee agencies.

(3) The evaluation by the director, in consultation with the Treasurer, of all statements timely submitted in response to the Notice of Request for Qualifications, using the criteria contained in the notice, and, based on the statements, the establishment of a qualified purchasers list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 757, Sec. 25.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

69521.5.

(a) The Director of Finance is authorized to take all actions that he or she deems to be necessary or convenient to accomplish any of the following:

(1) To preserve the state student loan guarantee program assets, pending consummation of their sale or the consummation of any other transaction, to maximize the value of the state student loan guarantee program to the state, including, without limitation, as authorized in Sections 69522, 69526, and 69766.

(2) To engage in negotiations with, and provide sufficient information regarding the state student loan guarantee assets and liabilities to, potential purchasers or any potential transferee guaranty program operator.

(3) To either consummate the sale of, and transfer, the state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities not retained to the Student Aid Commission to the transferee guarantee agency, or to consummate the agreement with the transferee guaranty program operator.

(4) To seek and negotiate with the United States Secretary of Education the designation of any alternative state student loan guarantee agency for California under the Federal Family Education Loan Program or the approval of the Secretary of Education of any transferee guaranty program operator to the extent required by Public Law 94-82, or subsequent federal regulations.

(5) To transfer the Federal Student Loan Reserve Fund to any transferee guaranty agency in a manner that is consistent with the intentions of the United States Secretary of Education.

(6) To transfer any of the state student loan guarantee program assets in the form of cash or investments not transferred to any transferee guaranty agency or transferee guarantee program operator directly to the General Fund.

(7) To retain any state student loan guarantee program assets determined by the director to be necessary or appropriate for the purposes of the Student Aid Commission.

(b) In order to accomplish the purposes of this article, the Director of Finance shall do all of the following:

(1) Notify the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the Senate and Assembly Budget Committees of the determination of the Director of Finance to proceed with a transaction other than the sale of the state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities pursuant to Section 69521.3, providing that notice no later than 30 days prior to the consummation of the transaction with the transferee guarantee program operator.

(2) Upon the consummation of the sale of the state student loan guarantee program assets to a transferee guaranty agency, the Director of Finance shall notify the Secretary of State and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(3) Upon the consummation of a transaction authorized by this article with a transferee guarantee program operator, the Director of Finance shall notify the Secretary of State and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(c) In order to accomplish the purposes of this article:

(1) The Student Aid Commission shall cooperate fully with the Director of Finance and, in particular, take all steps to preserve the state student loan guarantee program assets deemed necessary or convenient by the Director of Finance, including, without limitation, as set forth in Sections 69522, 69526, and 69766.

(2) The Student Aid Commission shall direct the auxiliary organization to cooperate fully with the director.

(3) Until the consummation of the sale or other transaction to maximize the value of the state student loan guarantee program to the state, all of the actions, approvals, and directions of the Student Aid Commission affecting the state student loan guarantee program shall be effective only upon the approval of the Director of Finance.

(4) Notwithstanding any provision of the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), the auxiliary organization shall, as directed by the Student Aid Commission under paragraph (2), cooperate fully with the Director of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 757, Sec. 26.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

69521.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, neither the approval of the Attorney General nor of the Director of General Services is required for the execution and implementation of the sale, lease, conveyance, exchange, transfer, or other disposition of the auxiliary organization, any state student loan guarantee program assets or liabilities held by the auxiliary organization, or any sale or other arrangement authorized by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

69521.7.

The state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities shall be transferred to the transferee guarantee agency upon the completion of any sale pursuant to this article, and may be transferred to the transferee guaranty program operator if contemplated by the transaction entered into pursuant to Section 69521.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

69521.8.

(a) The Director of Finance shall deposit all proceeds of any sale of, or any funds achieved through any other arrangement to maximize the value of, the state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities under this article, net of any costs related to that transaction, into the General Fund.

(b) The proceeds of any sale of, or any funds achieved through any other arrangement to maximize the value of, the state student loan guarantee program assets and liabilities are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in subdivision (c) of Section 8 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution. The disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

69521.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director of Finance is authorized to enter into an agreement with a firm or individual to act as an advisor to the state in the transactions contemplated by this article. Section 14838 of the Government Code and Article 4 (commencing with Section 10335) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code does not apply to any agreement entered into by the director with an advisor pursuant to this section.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director of Finance is also authorized to enter into a legal services agreement to obtain specialized legal advice related to the transactions contemplated by this article. Section 11040 of the Government Code and Section 6072 of the Business and Professions Code shall not apply to the legal services agreement entered into by the director pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

69521.10.

(a) The Director of Finance, in consultation with the Treasurer, shall select a firm or individual to provide advisory services based on demonstrated competence and professional qualifications necessary for the satisfactory performance of the services required, in the manner described in this section.

(b) The Director of Finance and the Treasurer shall establish selection criteria for selecting an advisor. The criteria may include, but are not necessarily limited to, factors such as professional excellence, demonstrated competence, specialized experience in performing similar services, education and experience of key personnel to be assigned, staff capability, ability to meet schedules, nature and quality of similar completed work of the firm or individual, reliability and continuity of the firm or individual, and other considerations deemed by the director and the Treasurer to be relevant and necessary to the performance of advisory services.

(c) The Director of Finance, for the purposes of obtaining services under this section, shall send a Notice of Request for Qualifications to firms and individuals in the underwriter and financial advisor pools of the Treasurer. The director shall publish this notice in the State Contracts Register pursuant to Sections 14827.1 and 14827.2 of the Government Code. The notice shall include a description of the advisory services required, the selection criteria based on which the contract award will be made, submission requirements and deadlines, and a Department of Finance contact name and telephone number for more information. A copy of the Notice of Request for Qualifications shall be provided to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within seven days of publication in the State Contracts Register.

(d) (1) After the final response date stated in the Notice of Request for Qualifications, the Director of Finance and the Treasurer shall review the responses submitted, and shall evaluate them using the criteria contained in the notice. The director and the Treasurer shall rank, in order of preference based on the criteria contained in the notice, the firm or individuals determined to be qualified to perform the required services.

(2) The Director of Finance and the Treasurer, or their designees, may interview any of the qualified firms or individuals regarding the experience and qualifications of those firms or individuals, as well as anticipated concepts and the benefits of alternative methods of furnishing the required services.

(e) (1) Following the interviews, if any, held pursuant to subdivision (d), the Director of Finance and the Treasurer shall adjust the ranking of the qualified individuals or firms to reflect those firms or individuals deemed to be the most highly qualified to perform the required services.

(2) The Director of Finance, in consultation with the Treasurer, shall enter into negotiations with the firm or individual most highly ranked pursuant to paragraph (1). If negotiations are concluded successfully, the director shall enter into a contract. If the director, in his or her sole discretion, concludes that the negotiations are unsuccessful, the director shall terminate the negotiations, and begin new negotiations, in consultation with the Treasurer, with the other firms or individuals ranked pursuant to paragraph (1) in order of their ranking, and either contract with or terminate negotiations with each next most highly ranked firm or individual.

(3) If, after pursuing the negotiation process set forth in paragraph (2), the Director of Finance has been unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract at fair and reasonable compensation, the director may reinstitute the selection process prescribed in this section, commencing with the issuance of a new Notice of Request for Qualifications.

(4) The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing within seven days of entering into a contract with an individual or firm pursuant to paragraph (2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 757, Sec. 27.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

69521.11.

(a) The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing upon his or her determination that neither the sale nor any other transaction authorized by this article is anticipated to achieve the purposes of this article.

(b) The Director of Finance shall cease those activities he or she is authorized or directed to undertake pursuant to this article and Sections 69522, 69526, and 69766 upon the earlier of:

(1) The 30th day following written notice by the director to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) January 10, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 757, Sec. 28.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Cash for College Program [69550. - 69551.]

69550.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that California students with financial need be made aware of the opportunities afforded to them through the various state and federal financial aid programs, including the Cal Grant Program established pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430).

(b) Since the creation of the Cal Grant A and Cal Grant B entitlement programs under Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434) of, and Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435) of, Chapter 1.7, efforts to provide information to students have been developed and implemented by various organizations and institutions. However, there is a need to consolidate, incorporate, expand, and improve these programs as a statewide effort in order to ensure access to workshops, information, and assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 741, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

69551.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The Cash for College Program has successfully established local regional partnerships that annually provide hands-on help in filling out financial aid forms necessary to receive financial assistance for college. This program was initiated by private foundations and the commission in 2002 with the goal of increasing the number of students who successfully complete the financial aid process and enroll in college. In 2007, the Cash for College Program succeeded in serving over 20,000 students and their families in 44 of the 58 counties in California, thereby helping the state to access tens of millions of dollars in federal Pell Grant financial aid for low-income
 students and increasing the number of students participating in the Cal Grant Program.
